Hawaii statutes.
[§269E-10] Commencement of excavation.
The center shall not prohibit an excavator from beginning excavation work:

(1) After receiving notice that all affected
operators have fulfilled the requirements of section 269E-9; or

(2) Five working days after the excavator provides
notice of the excavation to the center pursuant to section 269E-7(a); provided
that this subsection shall not be construed as affording the excavator any
immunity or protection from claims for damages or injuries relating to the excavation.
[L 2004, c 141, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next